District of Columbia statutes.
21-158

Final account.

On arrival of a ward at the age of 18 years the guardian shall exhibit a final account of his trust to the court and shall, agreeably to the court’s order, deliver up to the ward all the property of the ward in his hands and if he fails to do so, his bond may be sued upon for the use of the party interested, and he may be attached.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 744, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(a) (3)
July 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-75, § 4(c), 23 DCR 1181
1981 Ed., § 21-158.
1973 Ed., § 21-158.